Utah statutes.
57-26-111.   Effect of enforcement.
The enforcement of an assignment of rents by one or more of the methods
identified in Sections 57-26-107, 57-26-108, and 57-26-109, the application of
proceeds by the assignee under Section 57-26-112 after enforcement, the
payment of expenses under Section 57-26-113, or an action under Subsection
57-26-114(4) does not:
(1)  make the assignee a purchaser in possession of the real property;
(2)  make the assignee an agent of the assignor;
(3)  constitute an election of remedies that precludes a later action to
enforce the secured obligation;
(4)  make the secured obligation unenforceable;
(5)  limit any right available to the assignee with respect to the secured
obligation;
(6)  limit, waive, or bar any foreclosure or power of sale remedy under the
security instrument;
(7)  violate Section 78B-6-901; or
(8)  bar a deficiency judgment pursuant to any law of this state governing or
relating to deficiency judgments following the enforcement of any encumbrance,
lien, or security interest.
